Maryland, session 2025, SB0334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
6–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CRIME OF MALICIOUS OR FRAUDULENT BURNING” MEANS A
VIOLATION OF § 6–104, § 6–105, OR § 6–106 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT A CRIME OF MALICIOUS OR FRAUDULENT
BURNING THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OF OR SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY TO A
FIREFIGHTER.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE SEPARATE FROM
AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE IMPOSED FOR ANY
CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
– 1 –

Ch. 190 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –